tools/snowball/algorithms/serbian.sbl
    define Step_2 as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'skijima'
            'skijega'
            'skijemu'
            'skijem'
            'skega'
            'skemu'
            'skem'
            'skijim'
            'skijih'
            'skijoj'
            'skijeg'
            'skiji'
            'skije'
            'skija'
            'skoga'
            'skome'
            'skomu'
            'skima'
            'skog'
            'skom'
            'skim'
            'skih'
            'skoj'
            'ski'
            'ske'
            'sko'
            'ska'
            'sku'           (<-'sk')
            '{sx}kijima'
            '{sx}kijega'
            '{sx}kijemu'
            '{sx}kijem'
            '{sx}kega'
            '{sx}kemu'
            '{sx}kem'
            '{sx}kijim'
            '{sx}kijih'
            '{sx}kijoj'
            '{sx}kijeg'
            '{sx}kiji'
            '{sx}kije'
            '{sx}kija'
            '{sx}koga'
            '{sx}kome'
            '{sx}komu'
            '{sx}kima'
            '{sx}kog'
            '{sx}kom'
            '{sx}kim'
            '{sx}kih'
            '{sx}koj'
            '{sx}ki'
            '{sx}ke'
            '{sx}ko'
            '{sx}ka'
            '{sx}ku'        (<-'{sx}k')
            'stvima'
            'stvom'
            'stvo'
            'stva'
            'stvu'          (<-'stv')
            '{sx}tvima'
            '{sx}tvom'
            '{sx}tvo'
            '{sx}tva'
            '{sx}tvu'       (<-'{sx}tv')
            'tanijama'
            'tanijima'
            'tanijom'
            'tanija'
            'taniju'
            'tanije'
            'taniji'        (<-'tanij')
            'manijama'
            'manijima'
            'manijom'
            'manija'
            'maniju'
            'manije'
            'maniji'        (<-'manij')
            'panijama'
            'panijima'
            'panijom'
            'panija'
            'paniju'
            'panije'
            'paniji'        (<-'panij')
            'ranijama'
            'ranijima'
            'ranijom'
            'ranija'
            'raniju'
            'ranije'
            'raniji'        (<-'ranij')
            'ganijama'
            'ganijima'
            'ganijom'
            'ganija'
            'ganiju'
            'ganije'
            'ganiji'        (<-'ganij')
            'aninom'
            'anina'
            'aninu'
            'anine'
            'anima'
            'anin'
            'anom'
            'anu'
            'ani'
            'ana'
            'ane'           (<-'an')
            'inima'
            'inama'
            'inom'
            'ina'
            'ine'
            'ini'
            'inu'
            'ino'           (<-'in')
            'onovima'
            'onova'
            'onove'
            'onovi'
            'onima'
            'onom'
            'ona'
            'one'
            'oni'
            'onu'           (<-'on')
            'nijima'
            'nijega'
            'nijemu'
            'nijeg'
            'nijem'
            'nega'
            'nemu'
            'neg'
            'nem'
            'nijim'
            'nijih'
            'nijoj'
            'niji'
            'nije'
            'nija'
            'niju'
            'nima'
            'nome'
            'nomu'
            'noga'
            'noj'
            'nom'
            'nih'
            'nim'
            'nog'
            'no'
            'ne'
            'na'
            'nu'
            'ni'            (<-'n')
            'a{cy}oga'
            'a{cy}ome'
            'a{cy}omu'
            'a{cy}ega'
            'a{cy}emu'
            'a{cy}ima'
            'a{cy}oj'
            'a{cy}ih'
            'a{cy}om'
            'a{cy}eg'
            'a{cy}em'
            'a{cy}og'
            'a{cy}uh'
            'a{cy}im'
            'a{cy}e'
            'a{cy}a'        (<-'a{cy}')
            'e{cy}oga'
            'e{cy}ome'
            'e{cy}omu'
            'e{cy}ega'
            'e{cy}emu'
            'e{cy}ima'
            'e{cy}oj'
            'e{cy}ih'
            'e{cy}om'
            'e{cy}eg'
            'e{cy}em'
            'e{cy}og'
            'e{cy}uh'
            'e{cy}im'
            'e{cy}e'
            'e{cy}a'        (<-'e{cy}')
            'u{cy}oga'
            'u{cy}ome'
            'u{cy}omu'
            'u{cy}ega'
            'u{cy}emu'
            'u{cy}ima'
            'u{cy}oj'
            'u{cy}ih'
            'u{cy}om'
            'u{cy}eg'
            'u{cy}em'
            'u{cy}og'
            'u{cy}uh'
            'u{cy}im'
            'u{cy}e'
            'u{cy}a'        (<-'u{cy}')
            'ugovima'
            'ugovi'
            'ugove'
            'ugova'         (<-'ugov')
            'ugama'
            'ugom'
            'uga'
            'uge'
            'ugi'
            'ugu'
            'ugo'           (<-'ug')
            'logama'
            'logom'
            'loga'
            'logu'
            'loge'          (<-'log')
            'govima'
            'gama'
            'govi'
            'gove'
            'gova'
            'gom'
            'ga'
            'ge'
            'gi'
            'gu'
            'go'            (<-'g')
            'rarijem'
            'rarija'
            'rariju'
            'rario'         (<-'rari')
            'otijem'
            'otija'
            'otiju'
            'otio'          (<-'oti')
            'sijem'
            'sija'
            'siju'
            'sio'           (<-'si')
            'lijem'
            'lija'
            'liju'
            'lio'           (<-'li')
            'uju{cy}i'
            'ujemo'
            'ujete'
            'ujmo'
            'ujem'
            'uje{sx}'
            'uje'
            'uju'           (<-'uj')
            'cajevima'
            'cajevi'
            'cajeva'
            'cajeve'
            'cajama'
            'cajima'
            'cajem'
            'caja'
            'caje'
            'caji'
            'caju'          (<-'caj')
            '{cx}ajevima'
            '{cx}ajevi'
            '{cx}ajeva'
            '{cx}ajeve'
            '{cx}ajama'
            '{cx}ajima'
            '{cx}ajem'
            '{cx}aja'
            '{cx}aje'
            '{cx}aji'
            '{cx}aju'       (<-'{cx}aj')
            '{cy}ajevima'
            '{cy}ajevi'
            '{cy}ajeva'
            '{cy}ajeve'
            '{cy}ajama'
            '{cy}ajima'
            '{cy}ajem'
            '{cy}aja'
            '{cy}aje'
            '{cy}aji'
            '{cy}aju'       (<-'{cy}aj')
            '{dx}ajevima'
            '{dx}ajevi'
            '{dx}ajeva'
            '{dx}ajeve'
            '{dx}ajama'
            '{dx}ajima'
            '{dx}ajem'
            '{dx}aja'
            '{dx}aje'
            '{dx}aji'
            '{dx}aju'       (<-'{dx}aj')
            'lajevima'
            'lajevi'
            'lajeva'
            'lajeve'
            'lajama'
            'lajima'
            'lajem'
            'laja'
            'laje'
            'laji'
            'laju'          (<-'laj')
            'rajevima'
            'rajevi'
            'rajeva'
            'rajeve'
            'rajama'
            'rajima'
            'rajem'
            'raja'
            'raje'
            'raji'
            'raju'          (<-'raj')
            'bijima'
            'bijama'
            'bijom'
            'bija'
            'bije'
            'biji'
            'biju'
            'bijo'          (<-'bij')
            'cijima'
            'cijama'
            'cijom'
            'cija'
            'cije'
            'ciji'
            'ciju'
            'cijo'          (<-'cij')
            'dijima'
            'dijama'
            'dijom'
            'dija'
            'dije'
            'diji'
            'diju'
            'dijo'          (<-'dij')
            'lijima'
            'lijama'
            'lijom'
            'lije'
            'liji'
            'lijo'          (<-'lij')
            'nijama'
            'nijom'
            'nijo'          (<-'nij')
            'mijima'
            'mijama'
            'mijom'
            'mija'
            'mije'
            'miji'
            'miju'
            'mijo'          (<-'mij')
            '{zx}ijima'
            '{zx}ijama'
            '{zx}ijom'
            '{zx}ija'
            '{zx}ije'
            '{zx}iji'
            '{zx}iju'
            '{zx}ijo'       (<-'{zx}ij')
            'gijima'
            'gijama'
            'gijom'
            'gija'
            'gije'
            'giji'
            'giju'
            'gijo'          (<-'gij')
            'fijima'
            'fijama'
            'fijom'
            'fija'
            'fije'
            'fiji'
            'fiju'
            'fijo'          (<-'fij')
            'pijima'
            'pijama'
            'pijom'
            'pija'
            'pije'
            'piji'
            'piju'
            'pijo'          (<-'pij')
            'rijima'
            'rijama'
            'rijom'
            'rija'
            'rije'
            'riji'
            'riju'
            'rijo'          (<-'rij')
            'sijima'
            'sijama'
            'sijom'
            'sije'
            'siji'
            'sijo'          (<-'sij')
            'tijima'
            'tijama'
            'tijom'
            'tija'
            'tije'
            'tiji'
            'tiju'
            'tijo'          (<-'tij')
            'zijima'
            'zijama'
            'zijom'
            'zija'
            'zije'
            'ziji'
            'ziju'
            'zijo'          (<-'zij')
            'nalima'
            'nalama'
            'nalom'
            'nala'
            'nale'
            'nali'
            'nalu'
            'nalo'          (<-'nal')
            'ijalima'
            'ijalama'
            'ijalom'
            'ijala'
            'ijale'
            'ijali'
            'ijalu'
            'ijalo'         (<-'ijal')
            'ozilima'
            'ozilom'
            'ozila'
            'ozile'
            'ozilu'
            'ozili'         (<-'ozil')
            'olovima'
            'olovi'
            'olova'
            'olove'         (<-'olov')
            'olima'
            'olom'
            'ola'
            'olu'
            'ole'
            'oli'           (<-'ol')
            'lemama'
            'lemima'
            'lemom'
            'lema'
            'leme'
            'lemi'
            'lemu'
            'lemo'          (<-'lem')
            'ramama'
            'ramom'
            'rama'
            'rame'
            'rami'
            'ramu'
            'ramo'          (<-'ram')
            'arama'
            'arima'
            'arom'
            'aru'
            'ara'
            'are'
            'ari'           (<-'ar')
            'drama'
            'drima'
            'drom'
            'dru'
            'dra'
            'dre'
            'dri'           (<-'dr')
            'erama'
            'erima'
            'erom'
            'eru'
            'era'
            'ere'
            'eri'           (<-'er')
            'orama'
            'orima'
            'orom'
            'oru'
            'ora'
            'ore'
            'ori'           (<-'or')
            'esima'
            'esom'
            'ese'
            'esa'
            'esu'           (<-'es')
            'isima'
            'isom'
            'ise'
            'isa'
            'isu'           (<-'is')
            'ta{sx}ama'
            'ta{sx}ima'
            'ta{sx}om'
            'ta{sx}em'
            'ta{sx}a'
            'ta{sx}u'
            'ta{sx}i'
            'ta{sx}e'       (<-'ta{sx}')
            'na{sx}ama'
            'na{sx}ima'
            'na{sx}om'
            'na{sx}em'
            'na{sx}a'
            'na{sx}u'
            'na{sx}i'
